Georgia, session 2025_26, SB346.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act providing for the compensation of certain county officers and officials of DeKalb
County, approved March 31, 1976 (Ga. L. 1976, p. 3986), as amended, is amended by adding
a new section to read as follows:
"SECTION 1.2.
Pursuant to Section 1 of an Act to amend Article 1 of Chapter 6 of Title 15 of the
O.C.G.A., relating to general provisions regarding superior courts, approved May 6, 2024
(Ga. L. 2024, p. 738), as of January 1, 2025, the Stone Mountain Judicial Circuit shall be
known and may be referred to as the DeKalb Judicial Circuit. Any reference in this Act
S. B. 346
- 1 -

LC 47 3642
to the Stone Mountain Judicial Circuit shall be deemed to refer to the DeKalb Judicial
Circuit."
SECTION 2.
Said Act is further amended by revising Sections 2 and 2.1 as follows:
"SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the annual salary of each of
the officials of DeKalb County listed below shall be the following percentages of the gross
salary as defined in Section 1:
(1) Judge of the Probate Court..................................................................................95%
(2) Clerk of the Superior Court.................................................................................75%
(3) Tax Commissioner...............................................................................................75%
(4) Judge of the Juvenile Court..................................................................................95%
SECTION 2.1.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the annual salary of each of
the officials of DeKalb County listed below shall be the following percentages of the gross
salary as defined in Section 1:
(1) Chief Executive Officer......................................................................................100%
(2) Members of the Board of Commissioners.....................................31.984326641319%"
SECTION 3.
Said Act is further amended by revising Sections 3 and 3.1 as follows:
S. B. 346
- 2 -

LC 47 3642
"SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the annual salary of each of
the officials of DeKalb County listed below shall be the following percentages of the gross
salary as defined in Section 1:
(1) State Court Judge, Divisions A and B……............................................................95%
(2) State Court Solicitor...............................................................................................95%
(3) Chief Magistrate.....................................................................................................95%
(4) Associate Magistrate...............................................................................................85%
(5) District Attorney....................................................................................................100%
(6) Sheriff…………………………………………………………………………...100%
SECTION 3.1.
(a) The annual salary of the clerk of the State Court of DeKalb County shall be established
by the judges of the State Court of DeKalb County, subject to approval by the governing
authority of DeKalb County, and the clerk of the State Court of DeKalb County shall be
compensated as an employee of DeKalb County in all other respects.
(b) Each part-time associate judge of the Magistrate Court of DeKalb County shall be paid
an hourly rate commensurate with the annual salary provided in this Act to a full-time
associate judge of the Magistrate Court of DeKalb County.
(c) Each judge or official who receives compensation from DeKalb County funds pursuant
to this Act shall also receive from DeKalb County the same longevity pay that is provided
to all county employees. Such longevity pay shall be calculated based upon the total years
of service that the judge or official has provided as a judge, official, or employee of
DeKalb County."
SECTION 4.
This Act shall become effective on August 1, 2025.
S. B. 346
- 3 -

LC 47 3642
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 346
- 4 -